District of Columbia statutes.
19-1510

Disclaimer by appointee, object, or taker in default of exercise of power of appointment.

(a)

A disclaimer of an interest in property by an appointee of a power of appointment takes effect as of the time the instrument by which the holder exercises the power becomes irrevocable.

(b)

A disclaimer of an interest in property by an object or taker in default of an exercise of a power of appointment takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the power becomes irrevocable.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).